Louisiana, session 2026, HB756.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 34:851.4(A)(2) through (7), (10), and (12), 851.10, 851.29, 855.2,
and 855.3(A) are hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§851.4. Careless operation of a watercraft
A. Careless operation of a watercraft is the operation of a watercraft in a
careless manner so as to endanger the life, limb, or property of any person, when
such operation constitutes a violation of any of the following requirements:
* * *
(2) A vessel overtaking another vessel may do so on either side, but must
grant the right-of-way shall give way to the vessel being overtaken.
(3) When vessels are on paths that cross, the vessel on the left will shall yield
right-of-way and give way to the vessel on the right.
(4) Motorboats shall yield right-of-way and give way to non-motor powered
boats sailing vessels under sail power alone, except when being overtaken by non-
powered sailing vessels, for deep draft vessels that have to remain in narrow
channels, or when the vessel is towing another vessel.
(5) Motorboats must shall maintain a direct course safe speed and use
caution when passing sailboats manually propelled vessels.
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 756 ENROLLED
(6) A vessel approaching a landing dock or pier shall yield the right-of-way
and give way to any departing vessel.
(7) A vessel departing shoreline or tributary shall yield right-of-way and give
way to through traffic and vessels approaching shoreline or tributary.
* * *
(10) Vessels When approaching a vessel, an operator yielding right-of-way
and giving way shall reduce speed, stop, reverse, or alter course to avoid collision
a boating incident as defined in R.S. 34:851.10. Vessel with right-of-way The other
vessel shall hold course and speed. If there is danger of collision a boating incident,
all vessels will shall slow down, stop, or reverse until danger is averted.
* * *
(12) No All mechanically propelled vessel vessels shall be operated so as to
traverse at a safe speed when traversing a course around any other vessel underway
or near any person who is swimming.
* * *
§851.10. Collisions, crashes, and casualties; Boating incidents; theft,; reporting
A. For the purposes of this Section, the term "boating incident" means any
incident in which a death, missing person, personal injury, property damage, or total
vessel loss results from the vessel's operation, construction, seaworthiness,
equipment, or machinery when the vessel is in, upon, entering into, or exiting from
the water.
A. B. It shall be the duty of the operator of a vessel involved in a collision,
crash, or other casualty boating incident, so far as he can do so without serious
danger to his own vessel, crew, and passengers, if any, to render do all of the
following:
(1) Render to other persons affected by the collision, crash, or other casualty
boating incident such assistance as may be practicable and as may be necessary in
order to save them from or minimize any danger caused by the collision, crash, or
other casualty and also to give boating incident.
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 756 ENROLLED
(2) Give his name, address, and identification of his vessel in writing to any
person injured and to the owner of any property damaged in the collision, crash, or
other casualty boating incident.
B. C.(1) The operator of a vessel involved in a collision, crash, or other
casualty boating incident involving a recreational vessel and resulting in death or
injury to a person or property damage in excess of five hundred dollars must damage
to vessels and other property in an amount of two thousand dollars or more or
resulting in a complete loss of any vessel shall give notice of the incident
immediately, by the most prompt means of communication, to the department, the
nearest law enforcement agency, or to state police. Law enforcement agencies shall
notify the department immediately upon receiving information of a collision, crash,
or other casualty involving a vessel and resulting in death or injury to a person or
damages in excess of five hundred dollars boating incident. The driver operator of
any vessel involved in a collision, crash, or other casualty boating incident involving
a recreational vessel and resulting in death or injury to a person, or property damage
in excess of five hundred dollars damage to vessels and other property in an amount
of two thousand dollars or more or resulting in a complete loss of any vessel shall,
within five days after the incident, forward a department-approved incident report
form to the department. A full description of the collision or other casualty must
boating incident shall be reported and submitted on an official form supplied by the
department. In a crash an incident where the operator is incapable of filing a report,
each person on board shall bear the responsibility of notifying the department or
determining that a report has been submitted. The department shall submit to the
United States Coast Guard reportable accidents incidents consistent with the
Statement of Understanding between the state of Louisiana and the United States
Coast Guard. The department shall provide copies of completed crash incident
reports to any interested person upon request. The department may charge a fee not
to exceed five dollars for reports that do not exceed four pages and seven dollars and
fifty cents for reports that exceed four pages. The department may also charge a
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 756 ENROLLED
reasonable fee for copies of photographs, videotapes, audiotapes, and any
extraordinary-sized documents or documents stored on electronic media.
(2) When a collision, crash, or other casualty boating incident occurs within
the prohibited zone, as defined in R.S. 34:851.2(7), involving a vessel or vessel
flotilla within the scope of R.S. 34:851.24(J), the report required by this Subsection
shall also be made to the Greater New Orleans Expressway Commission within the
time period applicable to submitting such report to the department.
C. D. Every owner of a registered boat shall report its theft to the
Department of Wildlife and Fisheries within five days of discovery of theft. The
violation of the provisions of this Subsection shall not be subject to any penalty,
including the provisions of R.S. 34:851.31(C) and shall not be construed to be a
crime.
* * *
§851.29. Enforcement
It shall be the duty and responsibility of every wildlife agent and peace
officer of this state and its subdivisions to enforce the provisions of this Part, and in
the exercise thereof, they are hereby authorized to, except that no agent or officer
shall perform a vessel stop and or board any vessel for the purpose of addressing
inquiries to those on board, requiring appropriate proof of identification therefrom,
examining the certificate of numbers issued under this Part or in the absence of such
certificate requiring appropriate proof of identification of the owner or operator of
the vessel, and in addition, examining such vessel for compliance with this Part
enforcing the provisions of this Part unless the agent or officer has reasonable
suspicion that a violation of this Part has occurred or is occurring. Officers so
boarding any Any agent or officer who boards a vessel shall first identify themselves
himself and such the agent or officer, while in the performance of his duties, shall
be without liability not be liable for trespass.
* * *
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 756 ENROLLED
§855.2. Definitions
As used in this Part, "personal watercraft" means a vessel which uses an
inboard motor powering a water jet pump or other machinery as its primary source
of motive power and which is designed to be operated by a person sitting, standing,
or kneeling on the vessel, rather than the conventional manner of sitting or standing
inside the vessel.
§855.3. Regulation of personal watercraft
A. A person shall not operate a personal watercraft unless each person
aboard is wearing a type I, type II, type III, or type V personal flotation device
approved by the United States Coast Guard. Every person on board a personal
watercraft shall wear a personal flotation device and no operator of a personal
watercraft shall allow any person who is not wearing a personal flotation device to
be on board his personal watercraft. The use of an inflatable personal flotation
device while on board of a personal watercraft shall not constitute compliance with
this Section.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.